it: Varietà di miele: Acacia; Erba medica; Mirtillo; Grano saraceno; Castagno; Trifoglio; Tarassaco; Eucalipto; Epilobio; Erica; Melata; Lavanda; Leatherwood; Tiglio; Manuka; Miscela monoflorale; Multiflorale; Zagara; Pino; Lampone; Rosmarino; Salvia; Sidr; Timo; Tupelo; Millefiori; Altro
sv: Honungssort: Akacia; Luzern; Blåbär; Bovete; Kastanj; Klöver; Maskros; Eukalyptus; Mjölkört; Ljung; Bladhonung; Lavendel; Leatherwood; Lind; Manuka; Monofloral blandning; Flerblommig; Apelsinblomma; Tall; Hallon; Rosmarin; Salvia; Sidr; Timjan; Tupelo; Vildblomma; Annat
fr: Variété de miel: Acacia; Luzerne; Myrtille; Sarrasin; Châtaignier; Trèfle; Pissenlit; Eucalyptus; Épilobe; Bruyère; Miellat; Lavande; Leatherwood; Tilleul; Manuka; Mélange monofloral; Multifloral; Fleur d'oranger; Pin; Framboisier; Romarin; Sauge; Jujubier; Thym; Tupelo; Fleurs sauvages; Autre
tr: Bal çeşidi: Akasya; Yonca; Yaban mersini; Karabuğday; Kestane; Üçgül; Karahindiba; Okaliptüs; Yakıotu; Funda; Salgı; Lavanta; Leatherwood; Ihlamur; Manuka; Monofloral karışım; Çok çiçekli; Portakal çiçeği; Çam; Ahududu; Biberiye; Ada çayı; Sidr; Kekik; Tupelo; Kır çiçeği; Diğer
pt-PT: Variedade Honey: Acácia; Alfafa; Mirtilo; Trigo-sarraceno; Castanha; Trevo; Dente-de-leão; Eucalipto; Epilóbio; Urze; Melada; Lavanda; Leatherwood; Tília; Manuka; Mistura monofloral; Multifloral; Flor de laranjeira; Pinho; Framboesa; Alecrim; Salva; Sidr; Tomilho; Tupelo; Flores silvestres; Outro
el: Ποικιλία μελιού: Ακακίας; Μηδικής (Alfalfa); Μύρτιλου; Φαγόπυρου; Καστανιάς; Τριφυλλιού; Πικραλίδας; Ευκαλύπτου; Επιλόβιου; Ρεικιού; Μελιτώματος; Λεβάντας; Leatherwood; Φλαμουριάς; Manuka; Μείγμα μονοποικιλιακών; Πολυανθικό; Ανθέων πορτοκαλιάς; Πεύκου; Σμέουρου; Δεντρολίβανου; Φασκόμηλου; Sidr; Θυμαρίσιο; Tupelo; Αγριολούλουδων; Άλλο
hu: Mézfajta: Akác; Lucerna; Áfonya; Hajdina; Gesztenye; Lóhere; Gyermekláncfű; Eukaliptusz; Füzike; Hangafű; Mézharmat; Levendula; Leatherwood; Hárs; Manuka; Fajtaméz-keverék; Vegyes virág; Narancsvirág; Fenyő; Málna; Rozmaring; Zsálya; Sidr; Kakukkfű; Tupelo; Vadvirág; Egyéb
nl: Honing variëteit: Acacia; Luzerne; Blauwe bes; Boekweit; Kastanje; Klaver; Paardenbloem; Eucalyptus; Wilgenroosje; Heide; Honingdauw; Lavendel; Leatherwood; Linde; Manuka; Monoflorale blend; Multifloraal; Oranjebloesem; Dennen; Framboos; Rozemarijn; Salie; Sidr; Tijm; Tupelo; Wilde bloemen; Overig
ro-RO: Varietate de miere: Salcâm; Lucernă; Afine; Hrișcă; Castan; Trifoi; Păpădie; Eucalipt; Zburătoare; Iarbă neagră; Mană; Lavandă; Leatherwood; Tei; Manuka; Amestec monofloral; Polifloră; Flori de portocal; Pin; Zmeură; Rozmarin; Salvie; Sidr; Cimbrișor; Tupelo; Flori de câmp; Altele
pl: Odmiana miodu: Akacjowy; Z lucerny; Borówkowy; Gryczany; Kasztanowy; Koniczynowy; Mniszkowy; Eukaliptusowy; Z wierzbówki kiprzycy; Wrzosowy; Spadziowy; Lawendowy; Z miłowonki; Lipowy; Manuka; Mieszanka miodów nektarowych; Wielokwiatowy; Z kwiatów pomarańczy; Sosnowy; Malinowy; Rozmarynowy; Szałwiowy; Sidr; Tymiankowy; Tupelo; Z polnych kwiatów; Inny
th: ชนิดของน้ำผึ้ง: อะคาเซีย; อัลฟัลฟา; บลูเบอร์รี; บักวีต; เชสต์นัต; Clover; แดนดิไลออน; ยูคาลิปตัส; ไฟร์วีด; เฮเทอร์; น้ำผึ้งฮันนี่ดิว; ลาเวนเดอร์; เลเธอร์วูด; ลินเดน; มานูก้า; ผสมเกสรดอกไม้ชนิดเดียว; ดอกไม้หลากชนิด; ดอกส้ม; สน; ราสป์เบอร์รี; โรสแมรี; เซจ; ซิดร์; ไทม์; ทูเพโล; ดอกไม้ป่า; อื่นๆ
de: Auswahl an Honig: Akazie; Luzerne; Blaubeere; Buchweizen; Kastanie; Klee; Löwenzahn; Eukalyptus; Weidenröschen; Heidekraut; Honigtau; Lavendel; Leatherwood; Linde; Manuka; Sortenhonig-Mischung; Blütenmischung; Orangenblüte; Kiefer; Himbeere; Rosmarin; Salbei; Sidr; Thymian; Tupelo; Wildblume; Andere
en: Honey variety: Acacia; Alfalfa; Blueberry; Buckwheat; Chestnut; Clover; Dandelion; Eucalyptus; Fireweed; Heather; Honeydew; Lavender; Leatherwood; Linden; Manuka; Monofloral Blend; Multifloral; Orange Blossom; Pine; Raspberry; Rosemary; Sage; Sidr; Thyme; Tupelo; Wildflower; Other
sl-SI: Sorta medu: Akacija; Lucerna; Borovnica; Ajda; Kostanj; Detelja; Regrat; Evkaliptus; Ozkolistni vrbovec; Vresa; Gozdni med / Mana; Sivka; Leatherwood; Lipa; Manuka; Monoflorna mešanica; Cvetlični; Pomarančni cvet; Bor; Malina; Rožmarin; Žajbelj; Sidr; Timijan; Tupelo; Travniški; Drugo
ko: Honey 종류: 아카시아; 알팔파; 블루베리; 메밀; 밤; 클로버; 민들레; 유칼립투스; 파이어위드; 헤더; 감로; 라벤더; 레더우드; 린든; 마누카; 단일 밀원 블렌드; 멀티플로럴; 오렌지 블라썸; 소나무; 라즈베리; 로즈마리; 세이지; 시드르; 타임; 투펠로; 야생화; 기타
ru: Сорт меда: Акациевый; Люцерновый; Черничный; Гречишный; Каштановый; Клеверный; Одуванчиковый; Эвкалиптовый; Кипрейный; Вересковый; Падевый; Лавандовый; Лезервудовый; Липовый; Манука; Монофлорный купаж; Полифлорный; Апельсиновый цвет; Сосновый; Малиновый; Розмариновый; Шалфейный; Сидр; Тимьяновый; Тупело; Разнотравье; Другое
da: Honningvariant: Akacie; Lucerne; Blåbær; Boghvede; Kastanje; Kløver; Mælkebøtte; Eukalyptus; Gederams; Lyng; Honningdug; Lavendel; Lædertræ; Lind; Manuka; Monofloral blanding; Flerblomstret; Appelsinblomst; Fyrretræ; Hindbær; Rosmarin; Salvie; Sidr; Timian; Tupelo; Vilde blomster; Andet
cs: Odrůda medu: Akátový; Vojtěškový; Borůvkový; Pohankový; Kaštanový; Jetelový; Pampeliškový; Eukalyptový; Z vrbovky úzkolisté; Vřesový; Medovicový; Levandulový; Leatherwood (z Eucryphia lucida); Lipový; Manuka; Jednodruhová směs; Květový (smíšený); Z pomerančových květů; Borovicový; Malinový; Rozmarýnový; Šalvějový; Z cicimku trnitého (Sidr); Tymiánový; Tupelo; Z lučních květů; Jiný
nb: Honningvariasjon: Akasie; Alfalfa; Blåbær; Bokhvete; Kastanje; Kløver; Løvetann; Eukalyptus; Geitrams; Lyng; Honningdugg; Lavendel; Leatherwood; Lind; Manuka; Enkeltblomst-blanding; Flerblomstret; Appelsinblomst; Furu; Bringebær; Rosmarin; Salvie; Sidr; Timian; Tupelo; Villblomst; Annet
sk-SK: Druh medu: Agátový; Lucernový; Čučoriedkový; Pohánkový; Gaštanový; Ďatelinový; Púpavový; Eukalyptový; Vŕbovkový; Vresový; Medovicový; Levanduľový; Leatherwood; Lipový; Manuka; Monoflórová zmes; Multiflórový; Z pomarančových kvetov; Borovicový; Malinový; Rozmarínový; Šalviový; Sidr; Tymiánový; Tupelo; Z lúčnych kvetov; Iné
bg-BG: Сорт мед: Акациев; От люцерна; От боровинки; От елда; Кестенов; От детелина; От глухарче; Евкалиптов; От върбовка; От калуна; Манов; Лавандулов; От ледърууд; Липов; Манука; Монофлорен микс; Полифлорен; От портокалови цветове; Боров; От малини; От розмарин; От градински чай; От сидр; От мащерка; Тупело; От диви цветя; Друго
pt-BR: Mel variedade: Acácia; Alfafa; Mirtilo; Trigo-sarraceno; Castanha; Trevo; Dente-de-leão; Eucalipto; Epilóbio; Urze; Melato; Lavanda; Leatherwood; Tília; Manuka; Mistura monofloral; Multifloral; Flor de laranjeira; Pinho; Framboesa; Alecrim; Sálvia; Sidr; Tomilho; Tupelo; Flores silvestres; Outros
zh-TW: 蜂蜜品種: 洋槐蜜; 紫花苜蓿蜜; 藍莓蜜; 蕎麥蜜; 栗樹蜜; 三葉草蜜; 蒲公英蜜; 尤加利樹蜜; 柳蘭蜜; 石楠花蜜; 甘露蜜; 薰衣草蜜; 革木蜜; 菩提樹蜜; 麥蘆卡蜂蜜; 單花蜜混合; 百花蜜; 橙花蜜; 松樹蜜; 覆盆子蜜; 迷迭香蜜; 鼠尾草蜜; 錫德蜜; 百里香蜜; 藍果樹蜜; 野花蜜; 其他
zh-CN: 蜂蜜品种: 洋槐; 紫花苜蓿; 蓝莓; 荞麦; 栗树; 三叶草; 蒲公英; 桉树; 柳兰; 石楠花; 甘露; 薰衣草; 革木; 椴树; 麦卢卡; 单花混合蜜; 百花; 橙花; 松树; 覆盆子; 迷迭香; 鼠尾草; 锡德; 百里香; 紫树; 野花; 其他
hr-HR: Sorta meda: Bagrem; Lucerna; Borovnica; Heljda; Kesten; Djetelina; Maslačak; Eukaliptus; Vrbovica; Vrijesak; Medljikovac; Lavanda; Kožasto drvo; Lipa; Manuka; Mješavina monosortnog meda; Cvjetni; Cvjetovi naranče; Bor; Malina; Ružmarin; Kadulja; Sidr; Timijan; Tupelo; Livadni; Ostalo
fi: Hunajan lajike: Akasia; Sinimailanen; Mustikka; Tattari; Kastanja; Apila; Voikukka; Eukalyptus; Maitohorsma; Kanerva; Metsähunaja; Laventeli; Leatherwood; Lehmus; Manuka; Lajihunajasekoitus; Monikukkainen; Appelsiininkukka; Mänty; Vadelma; Rosmariini; Salvia; Sidr; Timjami; Tupelo; Villikukka; Muu
ja: はちみつの種類: アカシア; アルファルファ; ブルーベリー; ソバ; 栗; クローバー; タンポポ; ユーカリ; ヤナギラン; ヘザー; 甘露蜜; ラベンダー; レザーウッド; リンデン; マヌカ; 単花蜜ブレンド; 百花蜜; オレンジブロッサム; 松; ラズベリー; ローズマリー; セージ; シドル; タイム; テュペロ; ワイルドフラワー; その他
vi: Giống mật ong: Hoa keo; Cỏ linh lăng; Việt quất; Kiều mạch; Hạt dẻ; Cỏ ba lá; Bồ công anh; Bạch đàn; Hoa hồng liễu; Hoa thạch nam; Mật sương; Hoa oải hương; Cây Leatherwood; Hoa đoan; Manuka; Hỗn hợp đơn hoa; Đa hoa; Hoa cam; Thông; Mâm xôi; Hương thảo; Xô thơm; Táo ta (Sidr); Cỏ xạ hương; Tupelo; Hoa dại; Khác
lt-LT: Medaus rūšis: Akacijų; Liucernų; Šilauogių; Grikių; Kaštonų; Dobilų; Kiaulpienių; Eukaliptų; Ožkarožių; Viržių; Lipčiaus; Levandų; Odmedžių; Liepų; Manukos; Monoflorinis mišinys; Poliflorinis; Apelsinų žiedų; Pušų; Aviečių; Rozmarinų; Šalavijų; „Sidr“ medžio; Čiobrelių; Nysų; Laukinių augalų; Kita
es: Variedad de miel: Acacia; Alfalfa; Arándano; Trigo sarraceno; Castaño; Trébol; Diente de león; Eucalipto; Epilobio; Brezo; Mielato; Lavanda; Leatherwood; Tilo; Manuka; Mezcla monofloral; Multifloral; Azahar; Pino; Frambuesa; Romero; Salvia; Sidr; Tomillo; Tupelo; Flores silvestres; Otro